custom-dicts/ia.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX s Y 16
SFX s   a   stic/_B     ia      ds:istic
SFX s   e   stic/_B     ie      ds:istic
SFX s   o   stic/_B     io      ds:istic
SFX s   0   stic/_B     i       ds:istic
SFX s   a   istic/_B    [^i]a   ds:istic
SFX s   e   istic/_B    [^i]e   ds:istic
SFX s   o   istic/_B    [^i]o   ds:istic
SFX s   0   istic/_B    [^aeio] ds:istic
SFX s   a   stichissime/_B     ia      ds:istic
SFX s   e   stichissime/_B     ie      ds:istic
SFX s   o   stichissime/_B     io      ds:istic
SFX s   0   stichissime/_B     i       ds:istic
SFX s   a   istichissime/_B    [^i]a   ds:istic
SFX s   e   istichissime/_B    [^i]e   ds:istic
SFX s   o   istichissime/_B    [^i]o   ds:istic
SFX s   0   istichissime/_B    [^aeio] ds:istic

SFX t Y 9
SFX t   r   tor/_F      ar      ds:a    ds:tor
SFX t   er  itor/_F     er      ds:i    ds:tor
SFX t   r   tor/_F      ir      ds:i    ds:tor
SFX t   -   or/_F       t-      ds:0    ds:tor
SFX t   -   or/_F       [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sor
SFX t   r   trice/_S    ar      ds:a    ds:trice
SFX t   er  itrice/_S   er      ds:i    ds:trice
SFX t   r   trice/_S    ir      ds:i    ds:trice
SFX t   -   rice/_S     t-      ds:0    ds:trice
#SFX t  -   rice/_S     [sx]-   ds:0    ds:srice

SFX u Y 5
SFX u   r   tura/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:tura
SFX u   er  itura/_S    er      ds:i    ds:tura
SFX u   r   tura/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:tura
SFX u   -   ura/_S      t-      ds:0    ds:tura
SFX u   -   ura/_S      [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sura

SFX v Y 10
SFX v   r   tive/_B         ar      ds:a    ds:tiv
SFX v   er  itive/_B        er      ds:i    ds:tiv
SFX v   r   tive/_B         ir      ds:i    ds:tiv
SFX v   -   ive/_B          t-      ds:0    ds:tiv
SFX v   -   ive/_B          [sx]-   ds:0    ds:siv
SFX v   r   tivissime/_B    ar      ds:a    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   er  itivissime/_B   er      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   r   tivissime/_B    ir      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   -   ivissime/_B     t-      ds:0    ds:tiv  ds:issim
SFX v   -   ivissime/_B     [sx]-   ds:0    ds:siv  ds:issim

SFX w Y 5
SFX w   r   tivitate/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   er  itivitate/_S    er      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   r   tivitate/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   -   ivitate/_S      t-      ds:0    ds:tiv  ds:itate
SFX w   -   ivitate/_S      [sx]-   ds:0    ds:siv  ds:itate

SFX x Y 45
SFX x   a   esime   a       ds:esim po:adj
SFX x   0   sime    e       ds:esim po:adj
SFX x   i   esime   i       ds:esim po:adj
SFX x   o   esime   o       ds:esim po:adj
SFX x   0   esime   [^aeio] ds:esim po:adj
SFX x   a   esimo   a       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX x   0   simo    e       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX x   i   esimo   i       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX x   o   esimo   o       ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX x   0   esimo   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:o po:adv
SFX x   a   esimemente  a       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX x   0   simemente   e       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX x   i   esimemente  i       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX x   o   esimemente  o       ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX x   0   esimemente  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:mente po:adv
SFX x   a   esime   a       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX x   0   sime    e       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX x   i   esime   i       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX x   o   esime   o       ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX x   0   esime   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX x   a   esimo   a       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX x   0   simo    e       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX x   i   esimo   i       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX x   o   esimo   o       ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX x   0   esimo   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX x   a   esima   a       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX x   0   sima    e       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX x   i   esima   i       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX x   o   esima   o       ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX x   0   esima   [^aeio] ds:esim ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX x   a   esimes  a       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX x   0   simes   e       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX x   i   esimes  i       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX x   o   esimes  o       ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX x   0   esimes  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX x   a   esimos  a       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX x   0   simos   e       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX x   i   esimos  i       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX x   o   esimos  o       ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX x   0   esimos  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX x   a   esimas  a       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX x   0   simas   e       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX x   i   esimas  i       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX x   o   esimas  o       ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX x   0   esimas  [^aeio] ds:esim ds:a is:pl po:sb

SFX y Y 29
SFX y   0   -un/_x      nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -duo/_x     nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -tres/_x    nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -tre/_x     nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -quatro/_x  nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -cinque/_x  nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -sex/_x     nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -septe/_x   nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -octo/_x    nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -nove/_x    nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -prime/_B   nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -secunde/_B nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -tertie/_B  nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -quarte/_B  nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -quinte/_B  nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -sexte/_B   nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -septime/_B nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -octave/_B  nt[ai]
SFX y   0   -none/_B    nt[ai]
SFX y   i   esimoprime/_B   gi
SFX y   i   esimosecunde/_B gi
SFX y   i   esimotertie/_B  gi
SFX y   i   esimoquarte/_B  gi
SFX y   i   esimoquinte/_B  gi
SFX y   i   esimosexte/_B   gi
SFX y   i   esimoseptime/_B gi
SFX y   i   esimoctave/_B   gi
SFX y   i   esimonone/_B    gi
SFX y   e   odecime/_B      e
