custom-dicts/ia.dic
abolir/_Vmnv
abras-/_Wnvw
abrogar/_Vbcintv
absolut-/_Wintvwk
absorpt-/_Wntvw
abstract-/_Wnvw
acceptar/_Vbcnt
access-/_Wbcijnv
accordar/_Vbcjtu
accusar/_Vbcimntv
acidificar/_Vbcnt
act-/_Wntvw
adder/_Wnv
adduct-/_Wintv
adhes-/_Wnvw
adjudicar/_Vntv
admiss-/_Wbcnv
adular/_Vbcint
advent-/_Wuv
adversar/_Vv
affect-/_Wbcnvw
affinar/_Vmt
aggregar/_Vbcntv
aggress-/_Wntvw
agiotar/_Vgt
alarma/_Sas
allus-/_Wnvw
alphabetisar/_Vnt
amblar/_Vtu
amplificar/_Vintv
amputar/_Vbcnt
anachrone/_Aosq
anima/_Saos
anomale/_As
anticipar/_Vnt
antifederal/_Es
aperir/_Vbctv
apert-/_Wnu
appens-/_Wnw
applicar/_Vbcntv
approvisionar/_Vmt
archivo/_Sas
arder/_Vmu
argumentar/_Vbcntv
armar/_Veimtu
arrangiar/_Vbcmt
assaltar/_Vt
assert-/_Wintvw
asseverar/_Vnv
assortir/_Vmt
astrict-/_Wnv
atavo/_Saoqs
atomo/_Saoqrs
attract-/_Wntvw
augmentar/_Vbcntv
automobile/_Eaos
autonomia/_Saoqs
baba/_Sso
ballar/_Vbct
bastir/_Vmu
benefact-/_Wntv
billiardo/_Sx
billion/_Sx
bordar/_Vu
boxar/_Vt
brunir/_Vjmtu
buddha/_Saoqs
cadmiar/_Vu
calcear/_Vtu
calefact-/_Wjntv
candir/_Vtu
capital/_Eaos
capsular/_Vgtu
carillonar/_Vmt
cens-/_Wtuv
centi/_hlpx
centralisar/_Vint
character/_Ss
chromar/_Vgu
cisellar/_Vtu
clichar/_Vt
clientela/_Sos
coact-/_Wnv
coercer/_Vbcnvw
cognit-/_Wnv
colar/_Vju
collect-/_Wntvw
collocut-/_Wnt
collus-/_Winv
color/_Sas
commiserar/_Vnv
compensar/_Vbcintv
competer/_Wdntv
comprehens-/_Wbcnv
compunct-/_Wnv
concepto/_Sos
conciliar/_Eos
concuss-/_Wnv
conduct-/_Wbcintvw
confect-/_nu
confectionar/_Vt
conflict-/_Wnv
congress-/_nv
conjunct-/_Wntuv
consecut-/_Wnv
constitut-/_Wntv
constrict-/_Wintv
contrabando/_Sas
contrasignar/_Vu
contribut-/_Wntv
controlar/_Vbct
copular/_Vintv
cornar/_Vmu
corros-/_Wnvw
cosignar/_Vu
covar/_Vt
criminal/_Eaks
cualiar/_Vu
cult-/_Wtu
cumular/_Vbcnv
damascenar/_Vgt
dar/_Vntuv
deci/_xz
decorar/_Vntv
decret-/_Wiv
defect-/_Wbcnvw
delimitar/_Vnv
delinear/_Vmnt
deplet-/_Wnv
descript-/_Wbcntv
destruct-/_Wbcntvw
devolut-/_Wnv
devorar/_Vt
dictar/_Vtu
dictionario/_Sas
diffus-/_Wbcintvw
diminut-/_Wnv
direct-/_Wijntuvw
disbuttonar/_Vgu
discalcear/_Vmt
discurs-/_Wnvw
disincantar/_Vmt
disjunct-/_Wntv
dismacular/_Vitu
dispender/_Wt
dissipar/_Vbcntv
distract-/_Wbcnvw
distribut-/_Wntvw
divis-/_Wbcintv
dorar/_Vtu
dual/_Eakos
duo/_Sx
effect-/_ntvw
egress-/_ntv
elect-/_Wntvw
elogio/_Sas
emiss-/_Wntvw
emot-/_Wnvw
emular/_Vntv
eros-/_Wnvw
erupt-/_Wnvw
essugar/_Vt
eudemonia/_Saosq
europee/_A+akso
evas-/_Wintvw
evolut-/_Wnvw
exaggerar/_Vntv
excerpt-/_Wt
excess-/_Wvw
exclus-/_Wnvw
excret-/_Winv
exfilar/_Vu
expans-/_Wbcntvw
expectar/_Vbcdntv
exploder/_Wt
explos-/_Wbcnvw
express-/_Wnvw
expuls-/_Wnv
extrus-/_Wnv
facer/_Wbct
falcar/_Vtu
familia/_Ss
fatal/_Eakos
federal/_Eaos
feltrar/_Vnu
fetiche/_Saos
filar/_Vbcjmtu
filtrar/_Vbcgnt
fiss-/_Wbcnu
flagellante/_Sos
florer/_Vmu
flux-/_Wnv
folklore/_Saqs
forar/_Vgtu
formato/_Ss
fornicar/_Vint
fornir/_Vbcmntu
fract-/_Wnu
frangiar/_Vu
frir/_Vu
fumigar/_Vint
functional/_Eakos
futur/_Aaos
gaufrar/_Vgu
generar/_Vbcnttv
genit-/_Wtuv
german/_Aso
germinar/_Vbcintv
guarnir/_Vmnu
guerrear/_Vt
hellen/_A+aoqsf
historia/_Sosqrá
horizontal/_Eakos
humor/_Saos
hypersustentar/_Vnt
imbuccar/_Vmu
imitar/_Vbcntv
immaterial/_Eakos
impaginar/_Vnt
impugnar/_Vbcntu
impulsar/_Vnt
inaugurar/_Vintv
incastrar/_Vbcmtu
inclavar/_Vu
incunabule/_Aas
incurs-/_Wnv
incurvar/_Vbcnu
individual/_Eakos
indorsar/_Vbcmt
infallibile/_Ekos
infect-/_Wnvw
influx-/_Wnv
inject-/_Wintvw
injunct-/_Wnv
injuriar/_Vit
instaurar/_Vnt
instinct-/_nvw
institutional/_Eaos
instruct-/_Wntv
integral/_Eakos
intercept-/_ntvw
interject-/_nv
interlingua/_Sas
interprender/_Wt
intime/_Aakos
intrus-/_Wnv
invent-/_ntvw
investir/_Vbcmtu
irreal/_Eakos
irrigar/_Vbcint
irrupt-/_Wnv
jazz/_Ss
judicar/_Vimtuv
kayak/_Sas
laccar/_Vtu
lancear/_Vbcmt
latifundio/_Sas
lect-/_Wntu
legal/_Eakos
levar/_Vimtu
limar/_Vbctu
lingua/_Sasá
liquefact-/_Wbcntv
litigar/_Vnt
loyal/_Eakos
macular/_Vbcmntu
magnetisar/_Vbcnt
mahdi/_Saos
marginar/_Vtu
marin/_Aaso
massacrar/_Vt
maximal/_Eaos
medieval/_Eos
meditar/_Vbcntv
melior/_Eos
mens-/_Wtu
mercantil/_Eaos
metalingua/_Ss
methodo/_Saoqrs
mille/_Sx
milliardo/_Sx
million/_Sx
minimal/_Eaos
minuspreciar/_Vt
missionologia/_Sqs
mixt-/_Wntu
modal/_Ekso
modular/_Vbcgntu
molino/_Saosó
monadologia/_Sqs
mono/_SCaos
monstrar/_Vbcdgt
montan/_Aso
montar/_Vgtu
mulger/_Vntu
mundificar/_Vntv
narcisso/_Saoqs
nat-/_Wnuvw
navigar/_Vbcint
negative/_Aaosk
nickelar/_Vgtu
nihil/_Gs
nomenclar/_Vtu
notificar/_Vbcntv
numerar/_Vbcnt
object-/_ntvw
objective/_Aaosk
obsess-/_Wnvw
occlus-/_Wntv
officiar/_Vt
oligopolio/_Sas
optar/_Vv
ostentar/_Vint
paisage/_Sas
paraffinar/_Vgu
particular/_Eakos
pass-/_Wbcnvw
past-/_Wtu
pasteurisar/_Vnt
paulin/_Aaos
pejorar/_Vmnv
percept-/_Wbcntvw
perciar/_Vt
permiss-/_Wbcnvw
perspect-/_Wv
persuas-/_Wbcntv
piano/_Sas
piccar/_Vtu
plagiar/_Vt
platinar/_Vgtu
polir/_Vmtu
portent-/_Wnv
posit-/_Wnuvw
possess-/_Wintvw
possibile/_Ekso
post-/_u
precognit-/_Wnv
prelat-/_u
preparar/_Vintv
prescript-/_Wbcntv
prevent-/_Wnv
product-/_Wntvw
productive/_Aosk
profanar/_Vint
progress-/_Wnvw
prohiber/_Vintv
propagar/_Vbcntv
prostitut-/_Wnv
pugile/_Saos
pulverar/_Vt
punct-/_Wnu
qualificar/_Vbcntv
quarte/_Ay
quest-/_Wntu
quinte/_Ay
radical/_Ekso
raper/_Wmt
raspar/_Vejtu
react-/_Wntvw
recept-/_Wntvw
recess-/_Wnvw
recitar/_Vbcntv
recurs-/_Wnvw
redact-/_Wnt
redempt-/_Wintv
reflex-/_Wbcnvw
reforma/_Saos
refract-/_Wintuvw
relat-/_Wntvw
remar/_Vgt
repercuss-/_Wnvw
representar/_Vbcntv
rescript-/_Wnuv
respirar/_Vbcint
restaurar/_Vbcntv
retent-/_Wntvw
retract-/_Wntv
retroact-/_Wnvw
revival/_Uso
revocar/_Vbcintv
rimar/_Vt
ruina/_Saso
rupt-/_Wnut
salutar/_Vnt
satinar/_Vtu
scopar/_Vtu
sculpt-/_Wtu
sedar/_Vnv
select-/_Wintvw
sensation/_Sso
septime/_Ay
sequentiar/_Vt
serrar/_Vu
sexte/_Ay
shaman/_Sos
sigillar/_Vmntu
smaltar/_Vetu
social/_Eakos
specular/_Vbcntv
stabilisar/_Vint
stannar/_Vtu
stato/_Saoqrs
striar/_Vnu
struct-/_Wu
subject-/_Wnvw
subjugar/_Vbcnt
subordinar/_Vnv
substruct-/_Wnu
success-/_Wbcntv
suggest-/_Wbcnvw
supernatural/_Easo
supinar/_Vnt
suppress-/_Wntv
sut-/_Wu
taliar/_Vtu
tamisar/_Vent
terminar/_Vbcntv
terror/_Saos
tertie/_Ay
text-/_Wu
tons-/_Wntu
torquer/_Vmt
tract-/_Wntv
transfunder/_Wbct
tre/_x
trecenti/_lpx
tres/_Sx
trit-/_u
triturar/_Vbcmnt
tumefact-/_Wnv
ultramoderne/_Aso
un/_x
unct-/_Wnu
universal/_Eakos
urinar/_Vjnt
utopia/_Saoqs
vect-/_ntu
veda/_Sosq
venar/_Veintu
verificar/_Vbcintv
vestir/_Vmu
vindicar/_Vbcdntv
visitar/_Vbcnt
voltairian/_Aso
